New Jersey, session 221, A706.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, in consultation with experts in the commercial trucking industry, shall establish a program to increase the number of young drivers who possess a commercial driver license.  The program shall: (1)   assist young drivers in obtaining a commercial driver license; (2)   raise awareness about the benefits of holding a commercial driver license and otherwise encourage young drivers to obtain a commercial driver license; (3)   coordinate with members of the commercial trucking industry to recruit those drivers for employment opportunities; and (4)   engage in any other activities that the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission deems to be appropriate to fulfill the purposes of this act. b.    The commission shall include information on the program in the commissions annual report, including data on the number of young drivers that participated in the program in the most recent 12-month period, data on the number of young drivers who have obtained a commercial driver license, employment, or both under the program in the most recent 12-month period, and any other information that the chief administrator deems to be appropriate. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.